Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2588YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 376 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.507 Contribution limits for 1 candidates. 2 1. For the purposes of this section, âelection campaign 3 cycleâ means the time period between elections for a particular 4 office. Each primary, general, and special election is a 5 separate election campaign cycle. Separate contribution limits 6 for each type of election for a particular office, including 7 primary, general, and special elections, apply in an election 8 campaign cycle. 9 2. A person shall not make, and a candidate for the office 10 of a statewide elected official as defined in section 68B.2, 11 the candidateâs committee, or anyone acting on behalf of the 12 candidate or candidateâs committee shall not accept, any 13 contribution which will cause the total amount of the personâs 14 contributions to the candidate or candidateâs committee to 15 exceed the following amounts for an election campaign cycle: 16 a. From a political committee, four thousand dollars. 17 b. From a national political party, state statutory 18 political committee, or county statutory political committee, 19 forty thousand dollars. 20 c. From any other natural person, four thousand dollars. 21 3. A person shall not make, and a candidate for state 22 senator or state representative, the candidateâs committee, 23 or anyone acting on behalf of the candidate or candidateâs 24 committee shall not accept, any contribution which will cause 25 the total amount of the personâs contributions to the candidate 26 or candidateâs committee to exceed the following amounts for an 27 election campaign cycle: 28 a. From a political committee, one thousand dollars. 29 b. From a national political party, state statutory 30 political committee, or county statutory political committee, 31 ten thousand dollars. 32 c. From any other natural person, one thousand dollars. 33